Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.290

Housing for superintendent—Authorized—Limitation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any second-class school district with an enrollment of three hundred students or less may provide housing for the superintendent of the school district, or any person acting in the capacity of superintendent, by such means and with such moneys as the school district shall determine: PROVIDED, That any second-class school district presently providing such housing may continue to provide the same: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if such housing is exempt from real property taxation by virtue of school district ownership, the school district shall charge for such housing, rent at least equal to the amount of real property tax for which such housing would be liable were it not so owned.

[ 1984 c 40 s 10; 1975 1st ex.s. c 41 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.60.350.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 40: See note following RCW 28A.195.050.